Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202045-621
Repealed. Laws 2020, LB910, § 49. Nebraska Collection Agency Fund; created; use; investment; transfer.

(1) All fees collected under the Collection Agency Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to a special fund to be known as the Nebraska Collection Agency Fund. The board may use the fund as may be necessary for the proper administration and enforcement of the act. The fund shall be paid out only on proper vouchers approved by the board and upon warrants issued by the Director of Administrative Services and countersigned by the State Treasurer as provided by law. All fees and expenses of the Attorney General in representing the board pursuant to the act shall be paid out of such fund. Transfers from the fund to the Election Administration Fund, the Secretary of State Administration Cash Fund, or the General Fund may be made at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Nebraska Collection Agency Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(2) On or before July 5, 2013, the State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred thousand dollars from the Nebraska Collection Agency Fund to the Election Administration Fund.

Laws 1963, c. 500, § 25, p. 1603;

Laws 1971, LB 53, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 81-8,182;

Laws 1984, LB 471, § 21;

Laws 1989, LB 206, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 261, § 19;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 31;

Laws 2001, LB 541, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB199, § 21;

Laws 2019, LB298, § 14.
July 1, 2021
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.